Florida, session 2026, SB1722.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 40 41 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âApp Store 42 Accountability Act.â 43 Section 2.âSection 501.1733, Florida Statutes, is created 44 to read: 45 501.1733âApplication stores.â 46 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 47 (a)ââAccount holderâ means an individual associated with a 48 mobile device. 49 (b)ââAge categoryâ means one of the following categories of 50 individuals, based on age: 51 1.âA child, which means an individual who is under 13 years 52 of age; 53 2.âA younger teenager, which means an individual who is at 54 least 13 years of age and under 16 years of age; 55 3.âAn older teenager, which means an individual who is at 56 least 16 years of age and under 18 years of age; or 57 4.âAn adult, which means an individual who is at least 18 58 years of age. 59 (c)ââAge category dataâ means information about an account 60 holderâs age category collected by an app store provider and 61 shared with a developer. 62 (d)ââAge ratingâ means one or more classifications that 63 assess the suitability of an appâs content and functions for 64 different age categories. 65 (e)ââAppâ means a software application or electronic 66 service that a user may run or direct on a mobile device. The 67 term includes preinstalled applications. 68 (f)ââApp storeâ means any publicly available website, 69 software application, or electronic service that allows an 70 account holder to download an app from a third-party developer 71 onto a mobile device. 72 (g)ââApp store providerâ means a person that owns, 73 operates, or controls an app store. 74 (h)ââContent descriptionâ means a description of the 75 specific content elements or functions that informed an appâs 76 age rating. 77 (i)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Legal Affairs. 78 (j)ââDeveloperâ means a person that owns or controls an app 79 made available through an app store or an app preinstalled onto 80 a mobile device. 81 (k)ââKnowinglyâ mean to act with actual knowledge or to act 82 with knowledge fairly inferred based on objective circumstances. 83 (l)ââMinorâ means, unless the individual is married or 84 legally emancipated, an individual under 18 years of age. 85 (m)ââMinor accountâ means an account with an app store 86 provider, established by an individual who is a minor, which is 87 affiliated with a parent account. 88 (n)ââMobile deviceâ means a phone or general-purpose tablet 89 that: 90 1.âProvides cellular or wireless connectivity; 91 2.âIs capable of connecting to the Internet; 92 3.âRuns a mobile operating system; and 93 4.âIs capable of running apps through the mobile operating 94 system. 95 (o)ââMobile operating systemâ means software that: 96 1.âManages mobile device hardware resources; 97 2.âProvides common services for mobile device programs; 98 3.âControls memory allocation; and 99 4.âProvides interfaces for apps to access device 100 functionality. 101 (p)ââParentâ means, with respect to a minor, an individual 102 reasonably believed to be a parent, a legal guardian, an 103 individual with legal custody, or any other individual who has 104 the legal authority to make decisions on behalf of the minor 105 under applicable state law. 106 (q)ââParent accountâ means an account with an app store 107 provider which: 108 1.âIs verified to be established by an individual who the 109 app store provider has determined is at least 18 years of age or 110 married or emancipated through the app store providerâs age 111 verification methods; and 112 2.âMay be affiliated with one or more minor accounts. 113 (r)ââParental consent disclosureâ includes the following 114 information: 115 1.âIf the app store provider has an age rating for the app 116 or in-app purchase, the appâs or in-app purchaseâs age rating; 117 2.âIf the app store provider has a content description for 118 the app or in-app purchase, the appâs or in-app purchaseâs 119 content description; 120 3.âA description of: 121 a.âThe personal data collected by the app from an account 122 holder in compliance with, if applicable, part V of this 123 chapter; and 124 b.âThe personal data shared by the app and the methods 125 implemented by the developer to protect the personal data, 126 including, if the app meets the definition of a controller under 127 s. 501.702, the methods implemented by the developer to comply 128 with part V of this chapter; and 129 4.âWhether personal data is collected by the app and the 130 methods implemented by the developer to protect the personal 131 data, and, if the app meets the definition of a controller under 132 s. 501.702, the methods implemented by the developer to comply 133 with part V of this chapter. 134 (s)ââPreinstalled applicationâ means any app, or portion 135 thereof, which is present on a mobile device at the time of 136 purchase, initial activation, or first use by the consumer, 137 including browsers, search engines, and messaging, but excluding 138 core operating system functions, essential device drivers, and 139 applications necessary for basic device operation such as phone 140 call, settings, and emergency service applications. The term 141 includes apps, or portions thereof, installed or partially 142 installed by the device manufacturer, wireless service provider, 143 retailer, or any other party before purchase, initial 144 activation, or first use by the consumer and which may be 145 updated thereafter. 146 (t)ââSignificant changeâ means a material modification to 147 an appâs terms of service or privacy policy which: 148 1.âChanges the categories of data collected, stored, or 149 shared; 150 2.âAlters the appâs age rating or content descriptions; or 151 3.âIntroduces in-app purchases where in-app purchases were 152 not previously present or introduces advertisements where 153 advertisements were not previously present in the app. 154 (u)ââVerifiable parental consentâ means authorization that: 155 1.âIs provided by a parent account; 156 2.âIs given after the app store provider has clearly and 157 conspicuously provided the parental consent disclosure as part 158 of the app download, purchase, or in-app purchase process; and 159 3.âRequires the parent to make an affirmative choice to 160 grant consent or decline consent. 161 (2)âAPP STORE PROVIDERS.â 162 (a)âAn app store provider shall do all of the following: 163 1.âAt the time an individual located in this state creates 164 an account with the app store provider, or for existing 165 accounts, by July 1, 2028, request age category information from 166 the individual and verify the individualâs age category using: 167 a.âCommercially available methods reasonably designed to 168 ensure accuracy; or 169 b.âAn age verification method or process that complies with 170 department rule. 171 2.âIf the app store provider determines the individual is a 172 minor, require that the account be affiliated with a parent 173 account and obtain verifiable parental consent from the holder 174 of the affiliated parent account each time before allowing the 175 minor to download an app, purchase an app, or make an in-app 176 purchase. 177 3.âAfter receiving notice of a significant change from a 178 developer, notify the account holder of the significant change 179 and, for a minor account, notify the parent account and obtain 180 renewed verifiable parental consent before providing access to 181 the significantly changed version of the app. 182 4.âProvide to a developer, in response to a request 183 authorized under subsection (3), age category data for an 184 account holder located in this state and the status of 185 verifiable parental consent for a minor located in this state. 186 5.âProvide a mechanism for a parent account to withdraw 187 consent and notify a developer when a parent revokes verifiable 188 parental consent. 189 6.âProtect age category data and any associated 190 verification data by: 191 a.âIf applicable, complying with s. 501.1735; 192 b.âLimiting collection and processing to data necessary for 193 verifying an account holderâs age category, obtaining verifiable 194 parental consent, or maintaining compliance records; and 195 c.âTransmitting age category data using industry-standard 196 encryption protocols that ensure data integrity and data 197 confidentiality. 198 7.âFor preinstalled apps, provide available age category 199 information in response to a request from a developer and take 200 reasonable measures to facilitate verifiable parental consent 201 for use of the app in response to a request from a developer. 202 (b)âAn app store provider may not: 203 1.âEnforce a contract or terms of service against a minor 204 unless the app store provider has obtained verifiable parental 205 consent; 206 2.âKnowingly misrepresent the information in the parental 207 consent disclosure; or 208 3.âShare age category data and any associated data except 209 as required by this section or otherwise required by law. 210 (3)âDEVELOPERS.â 211 (a)âA developer shall: 212 1.âVerify through the app storeâs data-sharing methods the 213 age category data of account holders located in this state, and 214 for a minorâs account, whether verifiable parental consent has 215 been obtained; 216 2.âNotify app store providers of significant changes to an 217 app; 218 3.âUse age category data received through the app storeâs 219 data-sharing methods to enforce any developer-created, age 220 related restrictions, safety-related features, or defaults, and 221 to enforce compliance with applicable laws and regulations; and 222 4.âRequest any age category data or verifiable parental 223 consent at the time an account holder downloads an app, 224 purchases an app, or launches a preinstalled app for the first 225 time; when implementing a significant change to the app; or to 226 comply with applicable law. 227 (b)âA developer may request age category data: 228 1.âNo more than once during each 12-month period to verify 229 the accuracy of age category data associated with an account 230 holder or the continued account use within an age category 231 listed in paragraph (1)(b); 232 2.âWhen there is reasonable suspicion of an account 233 transfer or misuse outside of the age category; or 234 3.âAt the time an account holder creates a new account with 235 the developer. 236 (c)âWhen implementing any developer-created, age-related 237 restrictions, safety-related features, or defaults, a developer 238 must use the lowest age category listed in paragraph (1)(b) 239 indicated by age category data received through the app storeâs 240 data-sharing methods or age data independently collected by the 241 developer. 242 (d)âA developer may not: 243 1.âEnforce a contract or terms of service against a minor 244 unless the developer has verified through an app storeâs data 245 sharing methods that verifiable parental consent has been 246 obtained; 247 2.âKnowingly misrepresent any information in the parental 248 consent disclosure; or 249 3.âShare age category data with any person. 250 (4)âENFORCEMENT.â 251 (a)âA minor who has been harmed by a violation of this 252 section, or such minorâs parent, may bring a civil action 253 against an app store provider or a developer. In such action, 254 the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff: 255 1.âThe greater of actual damages or $1,000 for each 256 violation; 257 2.âPunitive damages if the violation was egregious; 258 3.âReasonable attorney fees; and 259 4.âLitigation costs. 260 (b)âA violation of this section is an unfair and deceptive 261 trade practice actionable under part II of this chapter by the 262 department. The department may bring an action against an app 263 store provider or a developer to: 264 1.âRecover a civil penalty not to exceed $7,500 for each 265 violation; 266 2.âRestrain or enjoin the app store provider or developer 267 from violating this section; 268 3.âSeek injunctive relief; 269 4.âRecover reasonable attorney fees; and 270 5.âRecover litigation costs and the costs of investigating 271 the violation. 272 (c)âFor the purpose of bringing an action pursuant to this 273 section, ss. 501.211 and 501.212 do not apply. 274 (5)âJURISDICTION.âFor purposes of bringing an action 275 pursuant to this section, any person who meets the definition of 276 an app store provider or developer which operates or develops an 277 app store or app likely to be accessed by minors and accessible 278 by minors located in this state is considered to be both engaged 279 in substantial and not isolated activities within this state and 280 operating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying on a business 281 and doing business in this state, and is therefore subject to 282 the jurisdiction of the courts of this state. 283 (6)âRULES.âThe department shall adopt rules to establish 284 definite processes and means by which an app store provider may 285 verify an account holderâs age category in accordance with this 286 section. 287 (7)âSAFE HARBOR; APPLICABILITY.â 288 (a)âA developer is not liable for a violation of this 289 section if the developer demonstrates that the developer: 290 1.âRelied in good faith on applicable age category data 291 received through an app storeâs data-sharing methods; 292 2.âRelied in good faith on notification from an app store 293 provider that verifiable parental consent was obtained if the 294 account holder was a minor; and 295 3.âComplied with the requirements of subsection (3). 296 (b)âIn determining an appâs age rating and content 297 description for purposes of this section, a developer is not 298 liable for a violation of this section if the developer uses 299 widely adopted industry standards to determine the appâs age 300 category and content description and applies those standards 301 consistently and in good faith. 302 (c)âThis subsection applies only to actions brought under 303 this section and does not limit a developerâs or app store 304 providerâs liability under any other applicable law. 305 (d)âThis section does not displace any other available 306 rights or remedies authorized under federal or Florida law. 307 (8)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis act may not be construed to do any 308 of the following: 309 (a)âPrevent an app store provider or developer from taking 310 reasonable measures to block, detect, or prevent distribution to 311 minors of unlawful material, obscene material, or other harmful 312 material; block or filter spam; prevent criminal activity; or 313 protect app store or app security. 314 (b)âRequire an app store provider to disclose user 315 information to a developer beyond age category data or status of 316 parental consent. 317 (c)âAllow an app store provider or developer to implement 318 measures required by this section in a manner that is arbitrary, 319 capricious, anticompetitive, or unlawful. 320 (d)âRequire an app store provider or developer to obtain 321 verifiable parental consent for an app that: 322 1.âProvides direct access to emergency services, including 323 911, crisis hotlines, or emergency assistance services, legally 324 available to minors; 325 2.âLimits data collection to information necessary to 326 provide emergency services in compliance with the Childrenâs 327 Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. s. 6501 et seq.; 328 3.âProvides access without requiring account creation or 329 collection of unnecessary personal information; and 330 4.âIs operated by or in partnership with a governmental 331 entity, a nonprofit organization, or an authorized emergency 332 service provider. 333 (e)âRequire a developer to collect, retain, reidentify, or 334 link any information beyond what is necessary to verify age 335 category data as required by this section, and what is 336 collected, retained, reidentified, or linked in the developerâs 337 ordinary course of business. 338 (f)âRequire an app store provider or developer to block 339 access to an application that an account holder has downloaded 340 or installed onto a mobile device before July 1, 2027, except to 341 the extent that a parent account revokes verifiable consent for 342 an affiliated minor account or there has been a significant 343 change to the application. 344 Section 3.âIf any provision of this act or its application 345 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 346 does not affect other provisions or applications of this act 347 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 348 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are 349 severable. 350 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2027.